en: Soccer goal target style: Corner frame; Corner pocket target; Corner ring; Goal mouth cover; Multi-hole sheet; Numbered panel target; Rebound net; Sheet or net; Shot blocker panel; Target bin or bag; Other
ja: サッカーゴールターゲットスタイル: コーナーフレーム; コーナーポケットターゲット; コーナーリング; ゴールマウスカバー; マルチホールシート; ナンバーパネルターゲット; リバウンドネット; シートまたはネット; シュートブロッカーパネル; ターゲットビンまたはバッグ; その他
da: Måltype for fodboldtræner: Hjørneramme; Mål med hjørnelommer; Hjørnering; Afdækning til mål; Dug med flere huller; Mål med nummererede paneler; Rebound-net; Dug eller net; Skudblokeringspanel; Målspand eller -pose; Andet
ru: Стиль мишени для футбольных ворот: Угловая рама; Мишень с угловыми карманами; Угловое кольцо; Защитный экран для ворот; Экран с несколькими отверстиями; Пронумерованная панель-мишень; Сетка для отскока (ребаундер); Экран или сетка; Панель для блокировки ударов; Корзина или мешок-мишень; Другое
cs: Styl cíle pro fotbalové branky: Rohový rám; Rohový terč s kapsou; Rohový kruh; Kryt otvoru branky; Plachta s více otvory; Terč s očíslovanými panely; Odrazová síť; Plachta nebo síť; Panel na blokování střel; Koš nebo vak s terčem; Jiné
de: Stil des Fußballtor-Ziels: Eckrahmen; Ecktaschen-Ziel; Eckring; Torabdeckung; Torwand mit mehreren Löchern; Nummeriertes Panel-Ziel; Rebound-Netz; Wand oder Netz; Shotblocker-Panel; Zieltonne oder -tasche; Andere
sk-SK: Štýl cieľovej plachty alebo terča na futbalovej bránke: Rohový rám; Rohový vreckový terč; Rohový kruh; Kryt otvoru bránky; Plachta s viacerými otvormi; Očíslovaný panelový terč; Odrazová sieť; Plachta alebo sieť; Blokovací panel; Terčový kôš alebo taška; Iný
hr-HR: Stil mete za nogometni gol: Kutni okvir; Kutni džep; Kutni prsten; Pokrov za gol; Cerada s više rupa; Numerirana ploča s metama; Mreža za odbijanje; Cerada ili mreža; Ploča za blokiranje udaraca; Koš ili vreća za mete; Ostalo
lt-LT: Futbolo vartų taikinio stilius: Kampinis rėmas; Kampinė kišenė; Kampinis žiedas; Vartų uždanga; Daugiaangė uždanga; Numeruotas skydas; Atmušimo tinklas; Uždanga arba tinklas; Metimų blokavimo skydas; Taikinio krepšys arba maišas; Kita
th: รูปแบบของเป้าฝึกซ้อมฟุตบอล: กรอบมุม; เป้าช่องมุม; ห่วงมุม; แผ่นคลุมปากประตู; แผ่นหลายรู; เป้าแผ่นตัวเลข; ตาข่ายกระดอนกลับ; แผ่นหรือตาข่าย; แผ่นบล็อกลูกยิง; ถังหรือถุงเป้าหมาย; อื่นๆ
fi: Jalkapallon maaliseinän tyyli: Nurkkakehikko; Nurkkatasku; Nurkkarengas; Maalin peite; Monireikäinen kangas; Numeroitu paneelikohde; Palautusverkko; Kangas tai verkko; Torjuntapaneeli; Kohdekori tai -kassi; Muu
bg-BG: Стил на тренировъчна цел за футболна врата: Ъглова рамка; Мишена с ъглов джоб; Ъглов ринг; Покривало за вратата; Платнище с множество отвори; Мишена с номериран панел; Мрежа за отскачане; Платнище или мрежа; Блокиращ панел за удари; Кош или чувал за мишена; Друго
zh-CN: 足球球门训练目标样式: 角落边框; 角落口袋靶; 角落圆环靶; 球门覆盖网; 多孔靶布; 编号面板靶; 反弹网; 靶布或网; 射门阻挡板; 球靶箱或袋; 其他
tr: Futbol kalesi hedefi stili: Köşe çerçevesi; Köşe cep hedefi; Köşe halkası; Kale ağzı örtüsü; Çok delikli branda; Numaralı panel hedef; Ribaund filesi; Branda veya file; Şut engelleyici panel; Hedef kutusu veya çantası; Diğer
ro-RO: Stil de țintă pentru poarta de fotbal: Cadru de colț; Țintă buzunar de colț; Inel de colț; Husă pentru deschiderea porții; Folie cu mai multe orificii; Panou țintă numerotat; Plasă de ricoșeu; Folie sau plasă; Panou de blocare a șutului; Coș sau sac țintă; Altele
zh-TW: 足球門靶樣式: 角落框架; 角落口袋標靶; 角落圓環; 球門網罩; 多孔網布; 數字面板標靶; 回彈網; 網布或球網; 阻擋面板; 標靶桶或標靶袋; 其他
pt-PT: Estilo do alvo de baliza de futebol: Estrutura de canto; Alvo com bolsa de canto; Anel de canto; Cobertura da boca da baliza; Lona com vários buracos; Alvo com painéis numerados; Rede de ressalto; Lona ou rede; Painel de bloqueio de remate; Cesto ou saco alvo; Outro
ko: 축구 골대 타겟 스타일: 코너 프레임; 코너 포켓 타겟; 코너 링; 골마우스 커버; 멀티홀 시트; 번호 패널 타겟; 리바운드 네트; 시트 또는 네트; 슛 블로커 패널; 타겟 빈 또는 가방; 기타
sv: Typ av skotträningsmål för fotboll: Hörnram; Hörnficka; Hörnring; Målduk; Duk med flera hål; Numrerad panel; Rebounder-nät; Duk eller nät; Skottblockerande panel; Träffkorg eller -väska; Övrigt
it: Stile del bersaglio per porta da calcio: Telaio angolare; Bersaglio a tasca angolare; Anello angolare; Copertura della porta; Telo multiforo; Bersaglio a pannello numerato; Rete di rimbalzo; Telo o rete; Pannello blocca-tiri; Cestino o sacca bersaglio; Altro
es: Estilo del objetivo de portería de fútbol: Estructura de esquina; Objetivo de bolsillo de esquina; Anillo de esquina; Cubierta de boca de portería; Lona con múltiples orificios; Objetivo de panel numerado; Red de rebote; Lona o red; Panel bloqueador de tiros; Cesto o bolsa de objetivo; Otro
nb: Målstil for fotballmål: Hjørneramme; Mållomme for hjørne; Hjørnering; Trekk for målåpning; Duk med flere hull; Nummerert blinkpanel; Returnett; Duk eller nett; Skuddblokkeringspanel; Målbøtte eller pose; Annet
vi: Kiểu mục tiêu khung thành bóng đá: Khung góc; Mục tiêu dạng túi góc; Vòng góc; Màn che khung thành; Tấm nhiều lỗ; Mục tiêu dạng bảng số; Lưới dội bóng; Tấm chắn hoặc lưới; Bảng chặn cú sút; Mục tiêu dạng thùng hoặc túi; Khác
el: Στυλ στόχου ποδοσφαιρικού τέρματος: Γωνιακός σκελετός; Δίχτυ-τσέπη γωνίας; Γωνιακός κρίκος; Κάλυμμα εστίας; Κάλυμμα με πολλαπλές οπές; Στόχος με αριθμημένα πάνελ; Δίχτυ ριμπάουντ (αναπήδησης); Κάλυμμα ή δίχτυ; Πάνελ μπλοκαρίσματος σουτ; Κάδος ή τσάντα-στόχος; Άλλο
nl: Voetbaldoel target stijl: Hoekframe; Hoekvaktarget; Hoekring; Doelmondafdekking; Doek met meerdere gaten; Genummerd paneltarget; Reboundnet; Doek of net; Shotblocker-paneel; Targetbak of -zak; Anders
pl: Styl siatki celowniczej do bramki piłkarskiej: Rama narożna; Tarcza z kieszeniami narożnymi; Obręcz narożna; Mata na bramkę; Mata z wieloma otworami; Tarcza z numerowanymi panelami; Siatka typu rebounder; Mata lub siatka; Panel blokujący strzały; Kosz lub worek celowniczy; Inny
hu: Focikapus célpont stílusa: Sarokkeret; Sarokzsebes célpont; Sarokgyűrű; Kaputakaró; Többlyukú ponyva; Számozott paneles célpont; Visszapattanó háló; Ponyva vagy háló; Lövésblokkoló panel; Célpontos kosár vagy táska; Egyéb
pt-BR: Alvo para gol de futebol estilo: Estrutura de canto; Alvo de bolso de canto; Argola de canto; Cobertura do gol; Lona com vários furos; Alvo de painel numerado; Rede de rebote; Lona ou rede; Painel bloqueador de chute; Cesto ou bolsa de alvo; Outro
sl-SI: Stil tarče za nogometni gol: Kotni okvir; Kotna tarča v obliki žepa; Kotni obroč; Pokrov za vratarjev prostor; Ponjava z več luknjami; Oštevilčena tarča; Odbojna mreža; Ponjava ali mreža; Odbijač udarcev; Tarča v obliki koša ali torbe; Drugo
fr: Type de cible d’entraînement de football: Cadre de coin; Cible de type poche de coin; Anneau de coin; Bâche de but; Bâche à trous multiples; Cible à panneaux numérotés; Filet de rebond; Bâche ou filet; Panneau pare-tirs; Bac ou sac cible; Autre